Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-118] Rules. The commissioner
may, in accordance with chapter 91, adopt reasonable rules as are necessary or
proper to carry out the purposes of this article. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next